Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.140

Change in organization of firm to be reported.

Any change in the organization of any firm, association, exchange, corporation, or partnership licensed under this chapter shall be reported to the director and the licensee's surety or sureties within thirty days.

[ 2003 c 395 s 3; 1959 c 139 s 14.]